testing/bxr-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../st/bxr/bin/ibxr.hfstol
    Morph: ../st/bxr/bin/bxr.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../st/bxr/bin/ibxr.fst
    Morph: ../st/bxr/bin/bxr.fst

Tests:
  Noun - гар: # Masculine vowel, Cns final
    гар+N+Sg+Nom: гар
    гар+N+Sg+Acc: гаре
    гар+N+Sg+Gen: гарай
    гар+N+Sg+Dat: гарда
    гар+N+Sg+Ins: гараар
    гар+N+Sg+Com: гартай
    гар+N+Sg+Abl: гарһаа
    гар+N+Pl+Nom: гарууд
    гар+N+Pl+Acc: гарууде
    гар+N+Pl+Gen: гаруудай
    гар+N+Pl+Dat: гаруудда
    гар+N+Pl+Ins: гаруудаар
    гар+N+Pl+Com: гаруудтай
    гар+N+Pl+Abl: гаруудһаа

  Noun - бэшэг: # Feminine vowel, Cns final
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Nom: бэшэг
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Acc: бэшэге
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Gen: бэшэгэй
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Dat: бэшэгда
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Ins: бэшэгаар
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Com: бэшэгтай
    бэшэг+N+Sg+Abl: бэшэгһаа
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Nom: бэшэгууд
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Acc: бэшэгууде
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Gen: бэшэгуудай
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Dat: бэшэгуудда
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Ins: бэшэгуудаар
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Com: бэшэгуудтай
    бэшэг+N+Pl+Abl: бэшэгуудһаа

  Noun - морин: # Neuter vowel, Cns final
    морин+N+Sg+Nom: морин
    морин+N+Sg+Acc: морине
    морин+N+Sg+Gen: мориной
    морин+N+Sg+Dat: моринди
    морин+N+Sg+Ins: моринаар
    морин+N+Sg+Com: моринтай
    морин+N+Sg+Abl: моринһаа
    морин+N+Pl+Nom: моринууд
    морин+N+Pl+Acc: моринууде
    морин+N+Pl+Gen: моринуудай
    морин+N+Pl+Dat: моринуудда
    морин+N+Pl+Ins: моринуудаар
    морин+N+Pl+Com: моринуудтай
    морин+N+Pl+Abl: моринуудһаа

  Noun - шшшор: # Low round vowel, Cns final
    шшшор+N+Sg+Nom: шшшор
    шшшор+N+Sg+Acc: шшшоре
    шшшор+N+Sg+Gen: шшшорэй
    шшшор+N+Sg+Dat: шшшорда
    шшшор+N+Sg+Ins: шшшораар
    шшшор+N+Sg+Com: шшшортай
    шшшор+N+Sg+Abl: шшшорһаа
    шшшор+N+Pl+Nom: шшшорууд
    шшшор+N+Pl+Acc: шшшорууде
    шшшор+N+Pl+Gen: шшшоруудай
    шшшор+N+Pl+Dat: шшшоруудда
    шшшор+N+Pl+Ins: шшшоруудаар
    шшшор+N+Pl+Com: шшшоруудтай
    шшшор+N+Pl+Abl: шшшоруудһаа

  Noun - Москва: # Invisible long vowel
    Москва+N+Sg+Nom: Москва
    Москва+N+Sg+Acc: Москвае
    Москва+N+Sg+Gen: Москвагай
    Москва+N+Sg+Dat: Москвада
    Москва+N+Sg+Ins: Москвааар
    Москва+N+Sg+Com: Москва
    Москва+N+Sg+Abl: Москваһаа

  Noun - : # Feminine vowel, long final final
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Nom: шэрээ
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Acc: шэрээе
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Gen: шэрээгэй
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Dat: шэрээда
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Ins: шэрээаар
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Com: шэрээтай
    шэрээ+N+Sg+Abl: шэрээһаа
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Nom: шэрээууд
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Acc: шэрээууде
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Gen: шэрээуудай
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Dat: шэрээуудда
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Ins: шэрээуудаар
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Com: шэрээуудтай
    шэрээ+N+Pl+Abl: шэрээуудһаа


  Noun - бороо: # Low round vowel, long final vowel
    бороо+N+Sg+Nom: бороо
    бороо+N+Sg+Acc: бороое
    бороо+N+Sg+Gen: бороогой
    бороо+N+Sg+Dat: бороода
    бороо+N+Sg+Ins: борооаар
    бороо+N+Sg+Com: бороотай
    бороо+N+Sg+Abl: борооһаа
    бороо+N+Pl+Nom: борооууд
    бороо+N+Pl+Acc: борооууде
    бороо+N+Pl+Gen: борооуудай
    бороо+N+Pl+Dat: борооуудда
    бороо+N+Pl+Ins: борооуудаар
    бороо+N+Pl+Com: борооуудтай
    бороо+N+Pl+Abl: борооуудһаа


  Noun - малгай: # Masculine vowel, final й
    малгай+N+Sg+Nom: малгай
    малгай+N+Sg+Acc: малгайе
    малгай+N+Sg+Gen: малгайгай
    малгай+N+Sg+Dat: малгайда
    малгай+N+Sg+Ins: малгайаар
    малгай+N+Sg+Com: малгайтай
    малгай+N+Sg+Abl: малгайһаа
    малгай+N+Pl+Nom: малгайууд
    малгай+N+Pl+Acc: малгайууде
    малгай+N+Pl+Gen: малгайуудай
    малгай+N+Pl+Dat: малгайуудда
    малгай+N+Pl+Ins: малгайуудаар
    малгай+N+Pl+Com: малгайуудтай
    малгай+N+Pl+Abl: малгайуудһаа


  Noun - нохой: # Low round vowel, final й
    нохой+N+Sg+Nom: нохой
    нохой+N+Sg+Acc: нохойе
    нохой+N+Sg+Gen: нохойгой
    нохой+N+Sg+Dat: нохойда
    нохой+N+Sg+Ins: нохойаар
    нохой+N+Sg+Com: нохойтай
    нохой+N+Sg+Abl: нохойһаа
    нохой+N+Pl+Nom: нохойууд
    нохой+N+Pl+Acc: нохойууде
    нохой+N+Pl+Gen: нохойуудай
    нохой+N+Pl+Dat: нохойуудда
    нохой+N+Pl+Ins: нохойуудаар
    нохой+N+Pl+Com: нохойуудтай
    нохой+N+Pl+Abl: нохойуудһаа


  Noun - Бээлэй: # Feminine vowel, final й
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Nom: бээлэй
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Acc: бээлэйе
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Gen: бээлэйгэй
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Dat: бээлэйда
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Ins: бээлэйаар
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Com: бээлэйтай
    бээлэй+N+Sg+Abl: бээлэйһаа
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Nom: бээлэйууд
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Acc: бээлэйууде
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Gen: бээлэйуудай
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Dat: бээлэйуудда
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Ins: бээлэйуудаар
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Com: бээлэйуудтай
    бээлэй+N+Pl+Abl: бээлэйуудһаа


  Noun - толи: # Final и
    толи+N+Sg+Nom: толи
    толи+N+Sg+Acc: толие
    толи+N+Sg+Gen: толиин
    толи+N+Sg+Dat: толида
    толи+N+Sg+Ins: толиаар
    толи+N+Sg+Com: толитай
    толи+N+Sg+Abl: толиһаа
    толи+N+Pl+Nom: толиууд
    толи+N+Pl+Acc: толиууде
    толи+N+Pl+Gen: толиуудай
    толи+N+Pl+Dat: толиуудда
    толи+N+Pl+Ins: толиуудаар
    толи+N+Pl+Com: толиуудтай
    толи+N+Pl+Abl: толиуудһаа
